Utah statutes.
61-1-2.   Investment adviser -- Unlawful acts.
(1)  It is unlawful for any person who receives any consideration from another
person primarily for advising the other person as to the value of securities
or their purchase or sale, whether through the issuance of analyses or reports
or otherwise to:
(a)  employ any device, scheme, or artifice to defraud the other person;
(b)  engage in any act, practice, or course of business which operates or
would operate as a fraud or deceit upon the other person; or
(c)  divide or otherwise split any consideration with any person not licensed
under this chapter as an investment adviser or investment adviser
representative.
(2) (a)  Except as may be permitted by rule of the division, it is unlawful
for any investment adviser to enter into, extend, or renew any investment
advisory contract unless it provides in writing that:
(i)  the investment adviser shall not be compensated on the basis of a share
of capital gains upon or capital appreciation of the funds or any portion of
the funds of the client;
(ii)  no assignment of the contract may be made by the investment adviser
without the consent of the other party to the contract; and
(iii)  the investment adviser, if a partnership, shall notify the other party
to the contract of any change in the membership of the partnership within a
reasonable time after the change.
(b)  Subsection 61-1-2(2)(a)(i) does not prohibit an investment advisory
contract which provides for compensation based upon the total value of a fund
averaged over a definite period, or as of definite dates or taken as of a
definite date.
(c)  "Assignment," as used in Subsection 61-1-2(2)(a)(ii), includes any direct
or indirect transfer or hypothecation of an investment advisory contract by
the assignor or of a controlling block of the assignor's outstanding voting
securities by a security holder of the assignor.
(d)  If the investment adviser is a partnership, no assignment of an
investment advisory contract is considered to result from the death or
withdrawal of a minority of the members of the investment adviser having only
a minority interest in the business of the investment adviser, or from the
admission to the investment adviser of one or more members who, after
admission, will be only a minority of the members and will have only a
minority interest in the business.
(3)  It is unlawful for any investment adviser to take or have custody of any
securities or funds of any client if:
(a)  the division by rule prohibits custody; or
(b)  in the absence of a rule, the investment adviser fails to notify the
division that he has or may have custody.
(4)  The division may by rule adopt exemptions from Subsections
61-1-2(2)(a)(i), (ii), and (iii) where such exemptions are consistent with the
public interest and within the purposes fairly intended by the policy and
provisions of this chapter.
